Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1115
Joint sessions of city councils; authorized.

The city councils of two or more cities of the first class may meet and hold joint sessions for purposes of the First-Class City Merger Act.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 15.